Washington statutes.
RCW 31.35.030

Administration—Rules—Duties of director.

(1) The director shall administer this chapter. The director may issue orders and adopt rules that, in the opinion of the director, are necessary to execute, enforce, and effectuate the purposes of this chapter. Rules to enforce the provisions of this chapter shall be adopted under the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) An application filed with the director under this chapter shall be in such form and contain such information as required by the director by rule and be consistent with the requirements of the loan guaranty program.

(3) After the director is satisfied that the applicant has satisfied all the conditions necessary for approval, the director shall issue a license to the applicant authorizing it to be an agricultural lender under this chapter.

(4) Any change of control of an agricultural lender shall be subject to the approval of the director. Such approval shall be subject to the same criteria as the criteria for approval of the original license. For purposes of this subsection, "change of control" means directly or indirectly, alone or in concert with others, to own, control, or hold the power to vote ten percent or more of the outstanding voting stock of an agricultural lender or the power to elect or control the election of a majority of the board of directors of an agricultural lender.

(5) The director may deny, suspend, or revoke a license if the agricultural lender violates any provision of this chapter or any rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

[ 1994 c 92 s 253; 1990 c 134 s 3.]